California statutes. Education Code
(2) November 1 of the 2012–13 school year.

(3) October 1 of the 2013–14 school year.

(4) September 1 of the 2014–15 school year and each school year thereafter.

(b) For good cause, the
 governing board of a school district may permit a child of proper age to be admitted to a class after the first school month of the school term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 705, Sec. 4.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48011.

A child who, consistent with Section 48000, has been admitted to the kindergarten maintained by a private or a public school in California or any other state, and who has completed one school year therein, shall be admitted to the first grade of an elementary school unless the parent or guardian of the child and the school district agree that the child may continue in kindergarten for not more than an additional school year.

A child who has been lawfully admitted to a public school kindergarten or a private school kindergarten in California and who is judged by the administration of the school district, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education, to be ready for first-grade work may be admitted to the first grade at the discretion of the school administration of the district and with the consent of the child’s parent or guardian if the child is at least five years of age. When a child has been legally enrolled in a public school of another district within or out of the state, he or she may be admitted to school and placed in the grade of enrollment in the district of former attendance, at the discretion of the school administration of the district entered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 221, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. High Schools [48031. - 48031.]

48031.

Any person who is eligible to attend high school and who does not reside in a high school district or in a unified school district may attend high school in any high school district or unified school district in the county in which he or she resides or in another county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1186, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Nonresidents [48050. - 48054.]

48050.

(a) The governing board of any school district may, with the approval of the county superintendent of schools, admit to the elementary and high schools of the school district pupils living in an adjoining state that is contiguous to the school district. An agreement shall be entered into between the governing board of the school district in this state and the governing board or authority of the school district in which the pupils from the adjoining state reside providing for the payment by the latter of an amount sufficient to reimburse the school district of attendance for the total cost of educating the pupil, including the total of the amounts expended per pupil for the current expenses of education, the use of buildings and equipment, the repayment of local bonds and interest payments
 and state building loan funds, capital outlay, and transportation to and from school. The amount of the tuition for the current expenses of education per unit of average daily attendance of pupils from the adjoining state shall equal the average current expenditure, exclusive of all transportation expenditures, per unit of average daily attendance in the school district of attendance. The per pupil cost attributable to capital outlay shall be on the basis of an average expenditure for the preceding five years. The cost of transportation shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per month. Tuition payments shall be made during the school year with final payment at the end of the school year after all costs have been determined. If the amount paid is more or less than the total cost of education and transportation, adjustment shall be made for the following semester or school year. The attendance of the pupils shall not be included in computing the average daily attendance of the class or school for the purpose of
 obtaining apportionment of state funds. In lieu of entering an agreement with the governing board or authority of the school district in which the pupil from the adjoining state resides, the governing board of the school district in this state may enter an agreement with the parent or guardian of the pupil on the same terms as is provided in this subdivision.

(b) This section is inapplicable to a pupil attending a school in a school district pursuant to Section 48204.4 and the pupil shall be included in computing the average daily attendance of the school for the purpose of obtaining apportionment of state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.   (SB 257)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

48051.

Any person, otherwise eligible for admission to any class or school of a school district of this state, whose parents are or are not citizens of the United States, whose actual and legal residence is in a foreign country adjacent to this state, and who regularly returns within a 24-hour period to said foreign country may be admitted to the class or school of the district by the governing board of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48052.

(a) The governing board of the school district shall, as a condition precedent to the admission of any person, under Section 48051, require the parent or guardian of such person to pay to the school district an amount not more than sufficient to reimburse the school district for the total cost of educating the person, including the total of the amounts expended per pupil for the current expenses of education, the use of buildings and equipment, the repayment of local bonds and interest payments and state building loan funds, capital outlay, and transportation to and from school. The per pupil cost attributable to capital outlay shall be on the basis of an average expenditure for the preceding five years. The cost of transportation shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per month. Tuition
 payments shall be made in advance for each month or semester during the period of attendance. If the amount paid is more or less than the total cost of education and transportation, adjustment shall be made for the following semester or school year. The attendance of the pupils shall not be included in computing the average daily attendance of the class or school for the purpose of obtaining apportionment of state funds. The school district shall not be eligible for nonimmigrant or noncitizen reimbursement under the provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 42900) of Part 24 of Division 3 of this title, Article 2 (commencing with Section 56865) of Chapter 6 of Part 30 of this division for these pupils.

(b) This section is inapplicable to a pupil attending a school in a school district pursuant to Section 48204.4 and the pupil shall be included in computing the average daily attendance of the school for the purpose of obtaining
 apportionment of state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 498, Sec. 2.   (SB 257)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

48053.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, and except as provided in Section 3074.7 of the Labor Code, no charges or fees of any kind shall be required to be paid by any apprentice, or by his parents or guardian, for admission or attendance in any class in any school district which provides instruction under Section 3074 of the Labor Code in accord with the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 3078 of that code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 750, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

48054.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop and implement a specific plan to help achieve the objectives contained in the April 17, 1996, Joint Statement between the United States and Japan providing for the educational exchange of high school pupils between the two countries. The plan shall include ways to best utilize the strong cooperative relationship between California and the Osaka Prefecture that was established pursuant to the Cooperation Agreement dated November 15, 1994, between the State of California and the Prefecture of Osaka.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the plan be developed and implemented no later than June 1, 1997. 

(c) The costs of the plan shall be funded through donations from the private sector. No state funds shall be appropriated to the State Department of Education for the purposes of developing and implementing the plan required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Promotion and Retention [48070. - 48071.]

48070.

The governing board of each school district and each county superintendent of schools shall adopt policies regarding pupil promotion and retention. A pupil shall be promoted or retained only as provided in the policies adopted pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 81.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

48070.5.

(a) In addition to the policy adopted pursuant to Section 48070, the governing board of each school district and each county board of education shall, in those applicable grade levels, approve a policy regarding the promotion and retention of pupils between the following grades:

(1) Between second grade and third grade.

(2) Between third grade and fourth grade.

(3) Between fourth and fifth grade.

(4) Between the end of the intermediate grades and the beginning of middle school grades which typically occurs between sixth grade and seventh grade, but may vary depending upon the grade configuration of the school or school district.

(5) Between the end of the middle school grades and the beginning of high school which typically occurs between eighth grade and ninth grade, but may vary depending upon the grade configuration of the school or school district.

(b) The policy shall provide for the identification of pupils who should be retained and who are at risk of being retained in their current grade level on the basis of either of the following:

(1) The results of the assessments administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 and the minimum levels of proficiency recommended by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 60648.

(2) The pupil’s grades and other indicators of academic achievement designated by the district.

(c) The policy shall base the identification of pupils pursuant to subdivision (b) at the grade levels identified pursuant to paragraph (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) primarily on the basis of the pupil’s level of proficiency in reading. The policy shall base the identification of pupils pursuant to subdivision (b) at the grade levels identified pursuant to paragraphs (3) through (5) of subdivision (a) on the basis of the pupil’s level of proficiency in reading, English language arts, and mathematics.

(d) (1) If either measure identified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) identifies that a pupil is performing below the minimum standard for promotion, the pupil shall be retained in his or her current grade level unless the pupil’s regular classroom teacher determines in writing that retention is not the appropriate intervention for the pupil’s academic deficiencies. This written determination shall specify the reasons that retention is not appropriate for the pupil and shall include recommendations for interventions other than retention that in the opinion of the teacher are necessary to assist the pupil to attain acceptable levels of academic achievement. If the teacher’s recommendation to promote is contingent upon the pupil’s participation in a summer school or interim session remediation program, the pupil’s academic performance shall be reassessed at the end of the remediation program, and the decision to retain or promote the pupil shall be reevaluated at that time. The teacher’s evaluation shall be provided to and discussed with the pupil’s parent or guardian and the school principal before any final determination of pupil retention or promotion.

(2) If the pupil does not have a single regular classroom teacher, the policy adopted by the school district shall specify the teacher or teachers responsible for the promotion or retention decision.

(e) The policy shall provide for parental notification when a pupil is identified as being at risk of retention. This notice shall be provided as early in the school year as practicable. The policy shall provide a pupil’s parent or guardian the opportunity to consult with the teacher or teachers responsible for the decision to promote or retain the pupil.

(f) The policy shall provide a process whereby the decision of the teacher to retain or promote a pupil may be appealed. If an appeal is made, the burden shall be on the appealing party to show why the decision of the teacher should be overruled.

(g) The policy shall provide that pupils who are at-risk of being retained in their current grade be identified as early in the school year, and as early in their school careers, as practicable.

(h) The policy shall indicate the manner in which opportunities for remedial instruction will be provided to pupils who are recommended for retention or who are identified as being at risk for retention.

(i) The policy adopted pursuant to this section shall be adopted at a public meeting of the governing board of the school district.

(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the retention of a pupil not included in grade levels identified pursuant to subdivision (a), or for reasons other than those specified in subdivision (b), if such retention is determined to be appropriate for that pupil. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a governing board from adopting promotion and retention policies that exceed the criteria established in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 742, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

48070.6.

(a) On or before August 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, utilizing data produced by the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System pursuant to Section 60900 and other available data, the Superintendent shall submit to the Governor, the Legislature, and the state board a report that shall be called the Annual Report on Dropouts in California. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) One-year dropout rates for each of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(2) Four-year cohort dropout rates for grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(3) Two- or
 three-year cohort dropout rates, as appropriate, for middle schools.

(4) Grade 9 to grade 10 promotion rates.

(5) Percentage of high school pupils for each of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, who are on track to earn sufficient credits to graduate.

(6) The average number of nonpromotional school moves that pupils make between grades 6 to 12, inclusive.

(7) “Full-year” dropout rates for alternative schools, including dropout recovery high schools, calculated using a methodology developed by the Superintendent to appropriately reflect dropout rates in each type of alternative school.

(8) An explanation of the
 methodology or methodologies used to calculate “full-year” dropout rates for alternative schools pursuant to paragraph (7).

(9) Other available data relating to dropout or graduation rates or pupil progress toward high school graduation.

(b) When cohort dropout rates can be calculated accurately using longitudinal data, the rates described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be replaced by dropout rates for cohorts of pupils entering middle school.

(c) When data is available, the report shall also include all of the following:

(1) Rates at which pupils graduate in four, five, and six years, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 52052.

(2) Percentage of high school graduates and dropouts who completed courses that are certified by the University of California as meeting admission requirement criteria for the University of California and California State University systems.

(3) Percentage of high school graduates and dropouts who completed two or more classes in career technical education.

(4) Percentage of high school graduates and dropouts who completed both course sequences described in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(5) Behavioral data by school and school district, including suspensions and expulsions.

(6) Truancy rates.

(7) GED earning rates.

(8) Chronic absentee rates, as defined in Section 60901.

(d) If possible, the data listed in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be presented in the report, organized as follows:

(1) By state.

(2) By county.

(3) By school district, both including and excluding charter schools.

(4) By school.

(e) The report shall include data from alternative middle and high
 schools, including continuation high schools, community day schools, juvenile court schools, special schools, opportunity schools, and schools attended by wards of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(f) The report may include relevant data on school climate and pupil engagement from the California Healthy Kids Survey.

(g) If possible, the data listed in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be presented for the following subgroups, if the subgroup consists of at least 50 pupils, and the subgroup constitutes at least 15 percent of the total population of pupils at a school:

(1) Grade level.

(2) Ethnicity.

(3) Gender.

(4) Low socioeconomic status.

(5) English learners.

(6) Special education status.

(h) The first Annual Report on Dropouts in California shall include data from the most recent year. Subsequent annual reports shall include data from the most recent year and, at a minimum, the two prior years, so that comparisons can be made easily.

(i) The Superintendent or his or her designee shall make an oral presentation of the contents of the report to the state board at a regularly scheduled meeting of the state board.

(j) The Superintendent shall make the contents of the report available on the department’s Internet Web site in a format that is easy for the public to access and understand.

(k) If inclusion of school-level data would render the written report unwieldy, the data may be omitted from the written report and posted on the department’s Internet Web site.

(l) It is the intent of the Legislature that the report prepared by the Superintendent be usable by schools, school districts, policymakers, researchers, parents, and the public, for purposes of identifying and understanding trends, causal relations, early warning indicators, and potential points of intervention to address the high rate of dropouts in California.

(m) For purposes of this section, dropouts shall be defined using the exit/withdrawal codes developed by the department.

(n) For purposes of this section, “dropout recovery high school” has the same meaning as defined in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 52052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 7.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

48071.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), “eligible pupil” means either
 of the following:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), “eligible pupil” means a pupil who has received deficient grades for at least one-half of the pupil’s coursework in the 2020–21 academic year. For purposes of this paragraph, a deficient grade is a D, F, a No Pass, or an equivalent as determined by the local educational agency.

(B) A pupil enrolled in grade 12 during the 2020–21 school year shall not be eligible for retention under this section.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive parent or guardian, the person having legal custody, or other educational rights holder.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall implement
 this section and shall permit an eligible pupil for whom a decision to retain is made by the local educational agency to be retained in the pupil’s 2020–21 grade level for the 2021–22 academic year.

(2) The requirements of this section are supplemental to, and do not replace, any existing
 retention policy, which shall continue to remain operative for all school years.

(c) A local educational agency, upon receiving a written request from the parent of an eligible pupil to retain the pupil for the 2021–22 school year, shall offer the parent a consultation with the parent, the pupil, the administrator, and a teacher. A consultation shall occur within 30
 calendar days of receiving the written request for a consultation and shall include all of the following:

(1) Discussion of all available learning recovery options, including both of the following:

(A) Specific interventions and supports pursuant to Part 24.6
 (commencing with Section 43520) of Division 3.

(B) Access to prior semester courses in which the pupil received a D or F letter grade in the 2020–21 academic year, some other form of credit recovery, or other support pursuant to Section 51225.

(2) Consideration of the pupil’s academic data and any other information relevant to whether retention is in the pupil’s best interests, academically and socially.

(3) Discussion about research on the effects of pupil retention and the types of interventions and supports that have been shown to be beneficial to pupils. 

(d) A local educational agency shall ensure that a retention decision is consistent
 with an eligible pupil’s individualized education program. 

(e) A local educational agency shall notify a parent with the final determination of the local educational agency’s decision regarding the pupil’s retention within 10 calendar days of the consultation described in subdivision (c).

(f) A pupil retained pursuant to this section shall also be offered supplemental interventions and supports pursuant to Part 24.6 (commencing with Section 43520) of Division 3.

(g) A pupil who is not retained pursuant to this section shall be offered both of the following:

(1) Specific interventions and support pursuant to Part 24.6 (commencing with Section 43520) of Division 3.

(2) Access to prior semester courses in which the pupil received a D or F letter grade in the 2020–21 academic year, some other form of credit recovery, or other supports pursuant to Section 51225.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 41, Sec. 1.   (AB 104)   Effective July 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Compulsory Education Law [48200. - 48361.]



  ARTICLE 1. Persons Included [48200. - 48208.]

48200.

Each person between the ages of 6 and 18 years not exempted under the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 48400) is subject to compulsory full-time education. Each person subject to compulsory full-time education and each person subject to compulsory continuation education not exempted under the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 48400) shall attend the public full-time day school or continuation school or classes and for the full time designated as the length of the schoolday by the governing board of the school district in which the residency of either the parent or legal guardian is located and each parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the pupil shall send the pupil to the public full-time day school or continuation school or classes and for the full time designated as the length of the schoolday by the governing board of the school district in which the residence of either the parent or legal guardian is located.

Unless otherwise provided for in this code, a pupil shall not be enrolled for less than the minimum schoolday established by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 411.)
-------------------------------------------

48200.5.

Notwithstanding Section 48200, any resident of the City of Carson who is the parent or legal guardian of a person subject to compulsory education may enroll that person in either the school district in which the residency of the parent or guardian is located or in the Los Angeles Unified School District pursuant to the terms of an agreement permitting those transfers that is mutually adopted by the Compton Unified School District and the Los Angeles Unified School District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

48201.

(a) Except for pupils exempt from compulsory school attendance under Section 48231, any parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of any minor between the ages of 6 and 16 years who removes the minor from any city, city and county, or school district before the completion of the current school term, shall enroll the minor in a public full-time day school of the city, city and county, or school district to which the minor is removed.

(b) (1) Upon a pupil’s transfer from one school district to another, the school district into which the pupil is transferring shall request that the school district in which the pupil was last enrolled provide any records that the district maintains in its ordinary course of business or receives from a law enforcement agency regarding acts committed by the transferring pupil that resulted in the pupil’s suspension from school or expulsion from the school district. Upon receipt of this information, the receiving school district shall inform any teacher of the pupil that the pupil was suspended from school or expelled from the school district and shall inform the teacher of the act that resulted in that action.

(2) A school district, or school district officer or employee, is not civilly or criminally liable for providing information under this subdivision unless it is proven that the information was false and that the district or district officer or employee knew or should have known that the information was false or the information was provided with a reckless disregard for its truth or falsity.

(3) Any information received by a teacher pursuant to this subdivision shall be received in confidence for the limited purpose for which it was provided and shall not be further disseminated by the teacher.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

48202.

The county board of education of each county may establish, by resolution, the following regulation requiring the reporting of various types of severance of attendance of or by any pupil subject to the compulsory education laws of California or of any one or more of the types of severance enumerated in subdivision (a) below and may require such reporting of any or all of the private and public schools of the county:

(a) The administration of each private school and public school district of the county shall, upon the severance of attendance by any pupil subject to the compulsory education laws of California, whether by expulsion, exclusion, exemption, transfer, suspension beyond 10 schooldays, or other reasons, report such severance to the county superintendent of schools in the jurisdiction. The report shall include names, ages, last known address and the reason for each such severance.

(b) It shall be the duty of the county superintendent of such county to examine such reports and draw to the attention of the county board of education and local district board of education any cases in which the interests of the child or the welfare of the state may need further examination.

(c) After preliminary study of available information in cases so referred to it, the county board of education may, on its own action, hold hearings on such cases in the manner provided in Sections 48915 through 48920 and with the same powers of final decision as therein provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48203.

(a) The superintendent of a school district and the principal of a private school in each county shall, upon the severance of attendance or the denial of admission of any child who is an individual with exceptional needs, as that term is defined in Section 56026, or who is a qualified handicapped person, as that term is defined in regulations promulgated by the United States Department of Education pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), but who is otherwise subject to the compulsory education laws of California, report the severance, expulsion, exclusion, exemption, transfer, or suspension beyond 10 schooldays to the county superintendent of schools. The report shall include names, ages, last known address, and the reason for the severance, expulsion, exclusion, exemption, transfer, or suspension.

(b) It is the duty of the county superintendent to examine those reports and draw to the attention of the county board of education and governing board of a school district any cases in which the interests of the child or the welfare of the state may need further examination.

(c) After a preliminary study of available information in cases referred to it, the county board of education may, on its own action, hold hearings on those cases in the manner provided in Section 48914 and with the same powers of final decision as therein provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil complies with the residency requirements for school attendance in a school district if he or she is any of the following:

(1) (A) A pupil placed within the boundaries of that school district in a regularly established licensed children’s institution or a licensed foster home as defined in Section 56155.5, or a family home pursuant to a commitment or placement under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) An agency placing a pupil in a home or institution described in subparagraph (A) shall provide evidence to the school that the placement or commitment is pursuant to
 law.

(2) A pupil who is a foster child who remains in his or her school of origin pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 48853.5.

(3) A pupil for whom interdistrict attendance has been approved pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 46600) of Part 26.

(4) A pupil whose residence is located within the boundaries of that school district and whose parent or legal guardian is relieved of responsibility, control, and authority through emancipation.

(5) A pupil who lives in the home of a caregiving adult that is located within the boundaries of that school district. Execution of an affidavit under penalty of perjury pursuant to Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 6550) of Division 11 of the Family Code by the caregiving adult is a sufficient
 basis for a determination that the pupil lives in the home of the caregiver, unless the school district determines from actual facts that the pupil is not living in the home of the caregiver.

(6) A pupil residing in a state hospital located within the boundaries of that school district.

(7) A pupil whose parent or legal guardian resides outside of the boundaries of that school district but is employed and lives with the pupil at the place of his or her employment within the boundaries of the school district for a minimum of three days during the school week.

(b) (1) A school district may deem a pupil to have complied with the residency requirements for school attendance in the school district if at least one parent or the legal guardian of the pupil is physically employed within the boundaries
 of that school district for a minimum of 10 hours during the school week.

(2) This subdivision does not require the school district within which at least one parent or the legal guardian of a pupil is employed to admit the pupil to its schools. A school district shall not, however, refuse to admit a pupil under this subdivision on the basis, except as expressly provided in this subdivision, of race, ethnicity, sex, parental income, scholastic achievement, or any other arbitrary consideration.

(3) The school district in which the residency of either the parents or the legal guardian of the pupil is established, or the school district to which the pupil is to be transferred under this subdivision, may prohibit the transfer of the pupil under this subdivision if the governing board of the school district determines that the transfer would negatively impact the court-ordered or
 voluntary desegregation plan of the school district.

(4) The school district to which the pupil is to be transferred under this subdivision may prohibit the transfer of the pupil if the school district determines that the additional cost of educating the pupil would exceed the amount of additional state aid received as a result of the transfer.

(5) The governing board of a school district that prohibits the transfer of a pupil pursuant to paragraph (2), (3), or (4) is encouraged to identify, and communicate in writing to the parents or the legal guardian of the pupil, the specific reasons for that determination and is encouraged to ensure that the determination, and the specific reasons for the determination, are accurately recorded in the minutes of the board meeting in which the determination was made.

(6) The
 average daily attendance for pupils admitted pursuant to this subdivision is calculated pursuant to Section 46607.

(7) Unless approved by the sending school district, this subdivision does not authorize a net transfer of pupils out of a school district, calculated as the difference between the number of pupils exiting the school district and the number of pupils entering the school district, in a fiscal year in excess of the following amounts:

(A) For a school district with an average daily attendance for that fiscal year of less than 501 pupils, 5 percent of the average daily attendance of the school district.

(B) For a school district with an average daily attendance for that fiscal year of 501 pupils or more, but less than 2,501 pupils, 3 percent of the average daily attendance of the school district or 25 pupils,
 whichever amount is greater.

(C) For a school district with an average daily attendance of 2,501 pupils or more, 1 percent of the average daily attendance of the school district or 75 pupils, whichever amount is greater.

(8) Once a pupil is deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for school attendance pursuant to this subdivision and is enrolled in a school in a school district the boundaries of which include the location where at least one parent or the legal guardian of a pupil is physically employed, the pupil does not have to reapply in the next school year to attend a school within that school district and the governing board of the school district shall allow the pupil to attend school through grade 12 in that school district if the parent or legal guardian so chooses and if at least one parent or the legal guardian of the pupil continues to be physically
 employed by an employer situated within the attendance boundaries of the school district, subject to paragraphs (2) to (7), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 37.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.1.

(a) A school district shall accept from the parent or legal guardian of a pupil reasonable evidence that the pupil meets the residency requirements for school attendance in the school district as set forth in Sections 48200 and 48204. Reasonable evidence of residency for a pupil living with his or her parent or legal guardian shall be established by documentation showing the name and address of the parent or legal guardian within the school district, including, but not limited to, any of the following documentation:

(1) Property tax payment receipts.

(2) Rental property contract, lease, or payment receipts.

(3) Utility service contract,
 statement, or payment receipts.

(4) Pay stubs.

(5) Voter registration.

(6) Correspondence from a government agency.

(7) Declaration of residency executed by the parent or legal guardian of a pupil.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a parent or legal guardian of a pupil to show all of the items of documentation listed in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(c) If an employee of a school district reasonably believes that the parent or legal guardian of a pupil has provided false or unreliable evidence of residency, the school district may make reasonable efforts to determine that the
 pupil actually meets the residency requirements set forth in Sections 48200 and 48204.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting access to pupil enrollment in a school district as otherwise provided by federal and state statutes and regulations. This includes immediate enrollment and attendance guaranteed to a homeless child or youth, as defined in Section 11434a(2) of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2) et seq.), without any proof of residency or other documentation.

(e) Consistent with Section 11432(g) of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.), proof of residency of a parent within a school district shall not be required for an unaccompanied youth, as defined in Section 11434a(6) of Title 42 of the United States Code. A school district shall accept a declaration of residency
 executed by the unaccompanied youth in lieu of a declaration of residency executed by his or her parent or legal guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 33.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.2.

(a) If a school district elects to undertake an investigation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 48204.1, the governing board of the school district shall adopt a policy regarding the investigation of a pupil to determine whether the pupil meets the residency requirements for school attendance in the school district before investigating any pupils.

(b) The policy shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the circumstances upon which the school district may initiate an investigation, which shall, at a minimum, require the school district employee to be able to identify specific, articulable facts supporting the belief that the parent or legal guardian of the pupil has provided false or
 unreliable evidence of residency.

(2) (A) Describe the investigatory methods that may be used by the school district in the conduct of the investigation, including whether the school district will be employing the services of a private investigator.

(B) Before hiring a private investigator, the policy shall require the school district to make reasonable efforts to determine whether the pupil resides in the school district.
